Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8202
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Trauma is a severe health problem in the State of Nebraska and a major cause of death and long-term disability;

(2) Trauma care is very limited in many parts of Nebraska, particularly in rural areas where there is a growing danger that some communities may be left without adequate emergency medical care;

(3) It is in the best interests of the citizens of Nebraska to establish an efficient and well-coordinated statewide trauma system to reduce costs and incidence of inappropriate and inadequate trauma care and emergency medical service; and

(4) The goals and objectives of a statewide trauma system are to: (a) Pursue trauma prevention activities to decrease the incidence of trauma; (b) provide optimal care for trauma victims; (c) prevent unnecessary death and disability from trauma and emergency illness; and (d) contain costs of trauma care and trauma system implementation.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 101.